Hawaii statutes.
§660-19 Signature, oath, evidence. The
return shall be signed by the person making it, and sworn to by the person,
unless the person is a sworn public officer making the return in the person's
official capacity. The return shall be evidence in the case, but not
conclusive. [L 1870, c 32, §14; RL 1925, §2742; RL 1935, §4327; RL 1945,
§10368; RL 1955, §239-19; HRS §660-19; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next